Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska67-449
Effect of conversion; entity unchanged.

(1) A partnership or limited partnership that has been converted pursuant to sections 67-446 to 67-453 is for all purposes the same entity that existed before the conversion.

(2) When a conversion takes effect:

(a) All property owned by the converting partnership or limited partnership remains vested in the converted entity;

(b) All obligations of the converting partnership or limited partnership continue as obligations of the converted entity; and

(c) An action or proceeding pending against the converting partnership or limited partnership may be continued as if the conversion had not occurred.

Laws 1997, LB 523, § 49.